trunk/incubator/apertium-sme-smj.sme.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AaÁáBbCcČčDdĐđEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLlMmNnŊŋOoPpRrSsŠšTtŦŧUuVvZzŽž</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="N"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="A"      c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="V"      c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="ADV"    c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="CC"     c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="CS"     c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="PO"     c="Postposition"/>
    <sdef n="PR"     c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="PCLE"   c="Particle"/>

    <sdef n="Nom"    c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="Acc"    c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="Gen"    c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="Com"    c="Comutative"/>
    <sdef n="Ess"    c="Essive"/>
    <sdef n="Ill"    c="Illative"/>
    <sdef n="Loc"    c="Locative"/>

    <sdef n="Pl"     c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="Sg"     c="Singular"/>

    <sdef n="PxSg1"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="PxSg2"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="PxSg3"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="PxDu1"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="PxDu2"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="PxDu3"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="PxPl1"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="PxPl2"  c=""/>
    <sdef n="PxPl3"  c=""/>

    <sdef n="Prop"   c="Proper"/>

    <sdef n="TV"     c="Transitive"/>
    <sdef n="IV"     c="Intransitive"/>

    <sdef n="CMPND"  c="Compound"/>
    <sdef n="IJ"     c="Interjection"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="ahte__CS">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="CS"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="áigá__ADV">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ADV"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="áigi__PO">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="PO"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aisttan__PR">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="PR"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aitto__PCLE">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="PCLE"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anti-__CMPND">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="CMPND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="blubb__IJ">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="IJ"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ja__CC">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="CC"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="anti-"><i>anti-</i><par n="anti-__CMPND"/></e>
    <e lm="sáme#giel"><i>sámegiel</i><par n="anti-__CMPND"/></e>
    <e lm="sáme#giel-"><i>sámegiel-</i><par n="anti-__CMPND"/></e>
    <e lm="sámi-"><i>sámi-</i><par n="anti-__CMPND"/></e>
    <e lm="ahte"><i>ahte</i><par n="ja__CC"/></e>
    <e lm="dahe"><i>dahe</i><par n="ja__CC"/></e>
    <e lm="dahje"><i>dahje</i><par n="ja__CC"/></e>
    <e lm="dahjege"><i>dahjege</i><par n="ja__CC"/></e>
    <e lm="dehe"><i>dehe</i><par n="ja__CC"/></e>
    <e lm="dehege"><i>dehege</i><par n="ja__CC"/></e>
    <e lm="ja"><i>ja</i><par n="ja__CC"/></e>
    <e lm="ja"><i>ja</i><par n="ja__CC"/></e>
    <e lm="dahje"><i>dahje</i><par n="ja__CC"/></e>
    <e lm="muhto"><i>muhto</i><par n="ja__CC"/></e>
    <e lm="sihke"><i>sihke</i><par n="ja__CC"/></e>
    <e lm="vai"><i>vai</i><par n="ja__CC"/></e>
    <e lm="dađe"><i>dađe</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="dan botta go"><i>dan<b/>botta<b/>go</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="danin go"><i>danin<b/>go</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="dasgo"><i>dasgo</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="dasságo"><i>dasságo</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="dego"><i>dego</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="earágo"><i>earágo</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="earretgo"><i>earretgo</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="gearddi"><i>gearddi</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="jes"><i>jes</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="juos"><i>juos</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="mađe"><i>mađe</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="maŋŋágo"><i>maŋŋágo</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="maŋŋilgo"><i>maŋŋilgo</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="mov"><i>mov</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="muhte"><i>muhte</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="nugo"><i>nugo</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="ovdalgo"><i>ovdalgo</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="plus"><i>plus</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="vai"><i>vai</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="vaikkeba"><i>vaikkeba</i><par n="ahte__CS"/></e>
    <e lm="amen"><i>amen</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="bea"><i>bea</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="bla"><i>bla</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="blubb"><i>blubb</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="ci"><i>ci</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="dua"><i>dua</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="fuos"><i>fuos</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="haha"><i>haha</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="hearrá#sivdnit"><i>hearrásivdnit</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="hehehe"><i>hehehe</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="heijjá"><i>heijjá</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="hohoi"><i>hohoi</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="huh"><i>huh</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="jo"><i>jo</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="juo"><i>juo</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="maid"><i>maid</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="oh"><i>oh</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="skole"><i>skole</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="voi"><i>voi</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="yeh"><i>yeh</i><par n="blubb__IJ"/></e>
    <e lm="almma"><i>almma</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="ama"><i>ama</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="amat"><i>amat</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="amma"><i>amma</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="ammahal"><i>ammahal</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="ammal"><i>ammal</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="ammat"><i>ammat</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="ammes"><i>ammes</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="ba"><i>ba</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="ban"><i>ban</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="dat"><i>dat</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="galhal"><i>galhal</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="ges"><i>ges</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="go"><i>go</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="goittot"><i>goittot</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="got"><i>got</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="han"><i>han</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="na"><i>na</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="no"><i>no</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="son"><i>son</i><par n="aitto__PCLE"/></e>
    <e lm="bajá#beal"><i>bajábeal</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="bálddas"><i>bálddas</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="beales"><i>beales</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="buohta"><i>buohta</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="dihte"><i>dihte</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="duohkin"><i>duohkin</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="gaskka"><i>gaskka</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="guhkkot"><i>guhkkot</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="gurrii"><i>gurrii</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="ládje"><i>ládje</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="lusa"><i>lusa</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="maŋŋel"><i>maŋŋel</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="miehtá"><i>miehtá</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="nuortta#bealde"><i>nuorttabealde</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="olgeš#bealde"><i>olgešbealde</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="olggo#beallai"><i>olggobeallai</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="ovdda#beallai"><i>ovddabeallai</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="rájes"><i>rájes</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="siskko#beallai"><i>siskkobeallai</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="vulo#beallái"><i>vulobeallái</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="vuostái"><i>vuostái</i><par n="áigi__PO"/></e>
    <e lm="badjelii"><i>badjelii</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="bajá#beale"><i>bajábeale</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="báras"><i>báras</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="beallai"><i>beallai</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="davá#bealde"><i>davábealde</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="duogá#bealde"><i>duogábealde</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="earet"><i>earet</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="gaskkal"><i>gaskkal</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="geažil"><i>geažil</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="gullut"><i>gullut</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="gurut#bealde"><i>gurutbealde</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="gurut#beallái"><i>gurutbeallái</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="maŋŋá"><i>maŋŋá</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="meattá"><i>meattá</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="oarjja#beallái"><i>oarjjabeallái</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="olggo#beale"><i>olggobeale</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="sealgge#bealde"><i>sealggebealde</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="siskko#beallái"><i>siskkobeallái</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="vulo#beallái"><i>vulobeallái</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="vuostá"><i>vuostá</i><par n="aisttan__PR"/></e>
    <e lm="akto"><i>akto</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="álohii"><i>álohii</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="baicca"><i>baicca</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="beallalaga"><i>beallalaga</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="bolkolagaid"><i>bolkolagaid</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="čomil"><i>čomil</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="datte"><i>datte</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="duo"><i>duo</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="erenoamáš"><i>erenoamáš</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="geardde"><i>geardde</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="gulul"><i>gulul</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="isidaš"><i>isidaš</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="liikka"><i>liikka</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="maŋimussii"><i>maŋimussii</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="muđuid"><i>muđuid</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="nuvttá"><i>nuvttá</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="ollásit"><i>ollásit</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="riđus"><i>riđus</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="šlumpa"><i>šlumpa</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="veháš"><i>veháš</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
    <e lm="vuostta#bealde"><i>vuosttabealde</i><par n="áigá__ADV"/></e>
